North Carolina, session 2025, SB1044.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. HIGH QUALITY MATHEMATICS INSTRUCTION
SECTION 1.(a) Article 8 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new Part to read:
"Part 1C. High-Quality Mathematics Instruction.
"§ 115C-83.20. State goal.
The goal of the State is to ensure that every student has mathematics skills at or above grade
level by the end of each grade and continues to progress so that he or she can have the
mathematics skills needed for secondary education and career success. The State Board of
Education and the Department of Public Instruction shall provide technical assistance as needed
to aid local school administrative units in reaching this goal and implementing all provisions of
this Part.
"§ 115C-83.21. Purposes.
The purposes of this Part are to ensure that (i) difficulty with mathematics skill development
is identified before students transition to a new grade, (ii) students receive appropriate
mathematics interventions to address difficulty with mathematics skill development and to
remediate math skill deficiencies, and (iii) each student and his or her parent or guardian be
informed of the student's academic needs and progress.
"§ 115C-83.22. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Part:
(1) Difficulty with mathematics skill development. – Performing at or below
grade level on screening assessments administered pursuant to
G.S. 115C-83.24.
(2) High-quality instruction. – Instruction that meets the criteria set forth in
G.S. 115C-83.23.
(3) Major mathematics skills. – Mathematics skills identified by the State Board
of Education to show grade level proficiency.
*S1044-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) Progressing toward grade level standards. – Showing improved performance
in major mathematics skills based on results on the screening assessment
administered pursuant to G.S. 115C-83.24.
"§ 115C-83.23. High-quality instruction.
Governing bodies of public school units shall implement high-quality mathematics
instruction for students in kindergarten through grade eight that meets the following criteria:
(1) Aligns with the North Carolina Standard Course of Study.
(2) Is evidence-based.
(3) Engages students and provides them with relevant challenges and pathways
to deeper understanding.
(4) Provides students at all levels of language proficiency with opportunities to
use written and oral forms of communication to learn and demonstrate
understanding of mathematics skills.
(5) Is for at least 60 minutes per day.
"§ 115C-83.24. Mathematics screening assessment.
(a) All students in kindergarten through grade eight shall be assessed at least three times
per school year with formative and diagnostic mathematics assessments made available to local
school administrative units by the State Board of Education pursuant to G.S. 115C-174.11(a1).
The first assessment in a given school year shall be administered within 30 days of the start of
the school year. Assessments shall meet the following criteria:
(1) Be valid and reliable.
(2) Align with the North Carolina Standard Course of Study.
(3) Align with this Part.
(4) Yield data that can be used with the Education Value-Added Assessment
System (EVAAS) to analyze student data to identify root causes for difficulty
with mathematics skill development and to determine actions to address them.
(b) The Department of Public Instruction shall partner with the vendor selected pursuant
to subsection (c) of this section to provide guidance and professional development to teachers
and administrators on the following to ensure that mathematics screening assessment data is used
to meaningfully inform instruction:
(1) Using mathematics screening assessment results to influence in-class
instruction.
(2) Planning for student interventions and MSPs.
(3) Progress monitoring of students based on mathematics screening assessment
results.
(c) The Department of Public Instruction shall develop and issue a request for proposals
(RFP) for a mathematics screening assessment tool to be administered to all students in
kindergarten through grade eight consistent with the requirements of Part 1C of Article 8 of
Chapter 115C. The Department may issue a new RFP if the State Board or Department
determines that a new contract is needed to comply with the provisions of subsection (a1) of this
section or G.S. 115C-83.24. The RFP shall require that proposals include at least the following:
(1) Assessments that align with the standard course of study.
(2) Assessments that can be administered three times per year, with progressing
standards for each subsequent assessment.
(3) Progress monitoring tools for teachers and administrators to be able to track
student progress.
(4) Provide results of assessments to teachers and parents no later than 15
calendar days after the assessment is administered.
(5) Ability to identify students in need of intervention.
(6) Ability to report results of assessments to the Department.
"§ 115C-83.25. Interventions and Mathematics Success Plans (MSPs).
Page 2 Senate Bill 1044-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(a) Students who are not grade level proficient in mathematics skills based on the results
of either (i) the first diagnostic or formative assessment of a school year or (ii) the first diagnostic
or formative assessment of the second semester of a school year administered pursuant to
G.S. 115C-83.24(a), shall be provided with intervention and remediation services documented in
a Mathematics Success Plan (MSP) that meets the requirements of this section and aligns with
the guidance and professional development provided pursuant to G.S. 115C-83.24(b). Students
shall continue to receive an MSP through the end of eighth grade or when the student
demonstrates grade level proficiency on the third mathematics screening assessment in a given
school year, whichever is earlier.
(b) A student's parent or guardian shall be given notice that the student has been identified
as having difficulty with mathematics skill development and that an MSP is being developed.
(c) The MSP shall be developed by a team consisting of the following:
(1) The math teacher of the student.
(2) Other relevant school personnel.
(d) The MSP shall be regularly adjusted based on multiple data sources indicating that
the student is not progressing toward grade level standards in one or more major mathematics
skills. Based on the most recently collected data, an MSP shall include the following information,
specific to the identified student:
(1) The specific mathematics skill deficiencies identified by the assessment data.
(2) Goals and benchmarks for growth.
(3) The means by which progress will be monitored and evaluated.
(4) The specific additional mathematics interventions the student will receive.
(5) Any additional services the teacher deems appropriate to accelerate the
student's mathematics skill development.
(e) A multitiered system of support intervention may be used to satisfy the requirements
of this section if all of the components of subsection (d) of this section are incorporated in the
intervention.
(f) The Department shall develop the following model documentation of compliance
with the requirements of this section:
(1) An MSP checklist.
(2) An alternative document for use with a multitiered system of support
intervention."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 115C-174.11 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-174.11. Components of the testing program.
(a) Reading Assessment Instruments for Kindergarten, First, Second, and Third Grades.
– The State Board of Education shall develop, adopt, and provide to the local school
administrative units developmentally appropriate individualized assessment instruments aligned
with the standard course of study and Part 1A of Article 8 of this Chapter for the kindergarten,
first, second, and third grades. Local school administrative units shall use these assessment
instruments provided to them by the State Board for kindergarten, first, second, and third grade
students to assess progress, diagnose difficulties, and inform instruction and remediation needs.
Local school administrative units shall not use standardized tests for summative assessment of
kindergarten, first, and second grade students except as required as a condition of receiving
federal grants.
(a1) Mathematics Assessment Instrument for kindergarten through eighth grade. – The
State Board of Education shall adopt and provide to the local school administrative units a series
of mathematics screener assessment instruments aligned with the standard course of study and
Part 1C of Article 8 of this Chapter for students in kindergarten through eighth grade. Public
school units shall administer the assessment instrument made available to them by the State
Board to assess progress, diagnose difficulties, and inform instruction and remediation needs for
students in kindergarten through eighth grade. Public school units shall not use these formative
Senate Bill 1044-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
and diagnostic assessments for summative assessment of students in kindergarten through eight
grade, except as required as a condition of receiving federal grants.
(b) Repealed by Session Laws 2009-451, s. 7.20(c), effective July 1, 2009.
(c) Annual Testing Program. –
(1) The State Board of Education shall adopt the tests for grades three through 12
that are required by federal law or as a condition of a federal grant. These tests
shall be designed to measure progress toward reading, communication skills,
and mathematics for grades three through eight, and toward competencies for
grades nine through 12. Students who do not pass the tests adopted for eighth
grade shall be provided remedial instruction in the ninth grade.
(2) If the State Board of Education finds that additional testing in grades three
through 12 is desirable to allow comparisons with national indicators of
student achievement, that testing shall be conducted with the smallest size
sample of students necessary to assure valid comparisons with other states.
(3) Repealed by Session Laws 2014-78, s. 3(a), effective July 1, 2014.
(4) To the extent funds are made available, the State Board of Education shall use
a competitive bid process to adopt one nationally norm-referenced college
admissions test to make available to local school administrative units, regional
schools, and charter schools to administer to all students in the eleventh grade
unless the student has already taken a comparable test and scored at or above
a level set by the State Board. The State Board of Education shall require the
administration of an alternate to the nationally norm-referenced college
admissions test or an alternate precursor test to the nationally norm-referenced
college admissions test to a student who (i) exhibits severe and pervasive
delays in all areas of conceptual, linguistic, and academic development and in
adaptive behaviors, including communication, daily living skills, and
self-care, (ii) is following the extended content standards of the Standard
Course of Study as provided in G.S. 115C-81.5, or is following a course of
study that, upon completing high school, may not lead to admission into a
college-level course of study resulting in a college degree, and (iii) has a
written parental request for an alternate assessment.
The State Board of Education shall ensure that parents of students enrolled
in all public schools, including charter and regional schools, have the
necessary information to make informed decisions regarding participation in
the nationally norm-referenced college admissions test and precursor test.
Alternate assessment and nationally norm-referenced college admissions
test assessment results of students with disabilities shall be included in school
accountability reports, including charter and regional schools, provided by the
State Board of Education.
(d) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the State Board of Education shall
not require the public schools to administer any standardized tests except for those required by
federal law or as a condition of a federal grant.
The State Board of Education shall adopt and provide to local school administrative units all
tests required by federal law or as a condition of a federal grant."
SECTION 1.(c) Section 6(d)(5) of S.L. 2018-32 reads as rewritten:
"(5) Part 1A, North Carolina Read to Achieve Program, and Part 1B of Article 8,
Part 1B, School Performance.Performance, and Part 1C of Article 8,
High-Quality Mathematics Instruction."
SECTION 1.(d) G.S. 115C-218.85 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
Page 4 Senate Bill 1044-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"(b1) High-quality mathematics instruction. – A charter school shall provide high-quality
mathematics instruction and mathematics screening assessments consistent with the requirements
of Part 1C of Article 8 of this Chapter."
SECTION 1.(e) G.S. 115C-238.66(1) is amended by adding a new sub-subdivision
to read:
"h. High-quality mathematics instruction. – The board of directors shall
provide high-quality mathematics instruction and mathematics
screening assessments consistent with the requirements of Part 1C of
Article 8 of this Chapter."
SECTION 1.(f) G.S. 115C-150.12C is amended by adding a new subdivision to
read:
"(3b) The board of trustees shall provide high-quality mathematics instruction and
mathematics screening assessments consistent with the requirements of Part
1C of Article 8 of this Chapter."
SECTION 1.(g) G.S. 116-239.8(b)(2) is amended by adding a new sub-subdivision
to read:
"a1. The chancellor shall ensure that laboratory schools provide
high-quality mathematics instruction and mathematics screening
assessments consistent with the requirements of Part 1C of Article 8
of this Chapter."
SECTION 1.(h) The Department shall select a vendor based on a proposal submitted
pursuant to G.S. 115C-83.24(c), as enacted by this act, by January 15, 2028, and the State Board
of Education shall make assessments available to public school units for use beginning with the
2028-2029 school year.
SECTION 1.(i) Beginning with the 2028-2029 school year, public school units shall
only use materials approved by the Office of Learning Research pursuant to Part 3 of this act for
mathematics instruction. MSPs developed pursuant to G.S. 115C-83.25 shall include a list of
high-quality instructional materials approved by OLR pursuant to Part 3 of this act to be used for
implementation of the MSP.
SECTION 1.(j) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of twenty-one million dollars ($21,000,000) in recurring funds
beginning with the 2026-2027 fiscal year to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 1.(k) Subsection (a) of this section becomes effective July 1, 2027.
Subsection (j) of this section expires June 30, 2031.

PART II. INITIAL REVIEW OF HIGH-QUALITY INSTRUCTIONAL MATERIALS
SECTION 2.(a) The Office of Learning Research (OLR), in consultation with the
Department of Public Instruction, researchers in the field of mathematics instruction, and other
relevant stakeholders, shall establish a process for evaluating vendors of instructional materials
intended for use in kindergarten through grade eight math instruction based on the following
criteria:
(1) Alignment with the standard course of study.
(2) Use of sound mathematical and evidence-based pedagogical strategies.
(3) Implementation of mathematical learning trajectories that are coherent and
mathematically accurate.
(4) Evidence of positive effects in other states.
(5) Inclusion of intervention materials that support the development of
grade-level math knowledge.
(6) Extent to vendor-led professional development accompanying materials
enhances teacher knowledge of evidence-based approaches to teaching math.
Senate Bill 1044-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2.(b) OLR shall provide a list of vendors approved pursuant to subsection
(a) of this section to the Department of Public Instruction by April 30, 2027. The Department
shall distribute this list to public school units by June 1, 2027.

PART III. LONG-TERM REVIEW OF HIGH-QUALITY INSTRUCTIONAL
MATERIALS
SECTION 3.(a) The North Carolina Collaboratory (Collaboratory) shall study
models used in other states to develop high-quality instructional materials at the state level and
report on the results of that study to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee by
April 15, 2027. The report shall include recommendations for how to implement a model to
develop high-quality instructional materials in North Carolina, including at least the following:
(1) Feasibility.
(2) Infrastructure and personnel needs.
(3) Analysis of start-up costs.
(4) Analysis of longer-term funding needs.
SECTION 3.(b) The Collaboratory shall conduct analyses of instructional quality,
teacher practice, and student outcomes based on the provisions of this act. The Collaboratory
shall use continuous improvement tools, including readiness assessments, observational rubrics,
high-quality instructional material implementation checklists, and educator surveys when
conducting these analyses. The Collaboratory shall report on the results of these analyses by
December 15, 2031.
SECTION 3.(c) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of
Governors of the University of North Carolina the sum of two million five hundred thousand
dollars ($2,500,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to allocate to the
Collaboratory to implement the provisions of Parts II and III of this act.

PART IV. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 4. Except as otherwise provided, this act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
Page 6 Senate Bill 1044-First Edition